Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5722
Guestroom or suite, defined.

Guestroom or suite means a sleeping room and directly associated private areas, such as a bathroom, a living room, and a kitchen area, if any, rented to the public for their exclusive transient occupancy, including, but not limited to, a guestroom or suite in a hotel, motel, inn, lodge, or other such establishment.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 7.